Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.070

Record date.

(1) The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing the record date for one or more voting groups in order to determine the shareholders entitled to notice of a shareholders' meeting, to demand a special meeting, to vote, or to approve any other corporate action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors of the corporation may fix the record date, which date may not precede the date on which the resolution fixing the record date is approved.

(2) If not otherwise fixed under subsection (1) of this section or RCW 23B.07.030, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at an annual or special shareholders' meeting is the day before the first notice is delivered to shareholders.

(3) A record date fixed under this section may not be more than seventy days before the meeting of shareholders or more than ten days prior to the date on which the first shareholder consent is executed under RCW 23B.07.040(1)(b).

(4) A determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a shareholders' meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, which it must do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

(5) If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date continues in effect or it may fix a new record date.

[ 2022 c 42 s 105; 2009 c 189 s 16; 1989 c 165 s 66.]